Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context:

(1)(a) "Accumulated contributions" for plan 1 members, means the sum of all regular annuity contributions and, except for the purpose of withdrawal at the time of retirement, any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2) with regular interest thereon.

(b) "Accumulated contributions" for plan 2 members, means the sum of all contributions standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual account, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the regular interest thereon.

(2) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of such mortality tables and regulations as shall be adopted by the director and regular interest.

(3) "Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by index B.

(4) "Annual increase" means, initially, fifty-nine cents per month per year of service which amount shall be increased each July 1st by three percent, rounded to the nearest cent.

(5) "Annuity" means the moneys payable per year during life by reason of accumulated contributions of a member.

(6) "Average final compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means the member's average earnable compensation of the highest consecutive sixty service credit months prior to such member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of average final compensation except under RCW 41.32.810(2).

(7)(a) "Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter.

(b) "Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.

(8) "Contract" means any agreement for service and compensation between a member and an employer.

(9) "Creditable service" means membership service plus prior service for which credit is allowable. This subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(10) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created in chapter 41.50 RCW.

(11) "Dependent" means receiving one-half or more of support from a member.

(12) "Director" means the director of the department.

(13) "Disability allowance" means monthly payments during disability. This subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(14)(a) "Earnable compensation" for plan 1 members, means:

(i) All salaries and wages paid by an employer to an employee member of the retirement system for personal services rendered during a fiscal year. In all cases where compensation includes maintenance the employer shall fix the value of that part of the compensation not paid in money.

(ii) For an employee member of the retirement system teaching in an extended school year program, two consecutive extended school years, as defined by the employer school district, may be used as the annual period for determining earnable compensation in lieu of the two fiscal years.

(iii) "Earnable compensation" for plan 1 members also includes the following actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(A) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or wages which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be considered earnable compensation and the individual shall receive the equivalent service credit.

(B) If a leave of absence, without pay, is taken by a member for the purpose of serving as a member of the state legislature, and such member has served in the legislature five or more years, the salary which would have been received for the position from which the leave of absence was taken shall be considered as compensation earnable if the employee's contribution thereon is paid by the employee. In addition, where a member has been a member of the state legislature for five or more years, earnable compensation for the member's two highest compensated consecutive years of service shall include a sum not to exceed thirty-six hundred dollars for each of such two consecutive years, regardless of whether or not legislative service was rendered during those two years.

(iv) For members employed less than full time under written contract with a school district, or community college district, in an instructional position, for which the member receives service credit of less than one year in all of the years used to determine the earnable compensation used for computing benefits due under RCW 41.32.497, 41.32.498, and 41.32.520, the member may elect to have earnable compensation defined as provided in RCW 41.32.345. For the purposes of this subsection, the term "instructional position" means a position in which more than seventy-five percent of the member's time is spent as a classroom instructor (including office hours), a librarian, a psychologist, a social worker, a nurse, a physical therapist, an occupational therapist, a speech language pathologist or audiologist, or a counselor. Earnable compensation shall be so defined only for the purpose of the calculation of retirement benefits and only as necessary to insure that members who receive fractional service credit under RCW 41.32.270 receive benefits proportional to those received by members who have received full-time service credit.

(v) "Earnable compensation" does not include:

(A) Remuneration for unused sick leave authorized under RCW 41.04.340, 28A.400.210, or 28A.310.490;

(B) Remuneration for unused annual leave in excess of two hundred forty hours as authorized by RCW 43.01.044 and 43.01.041.

(b) "Earnable compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means salaries or wages earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services, including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay.

"Earnable compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members also includes the following actual or imputed payments which, except in the case of (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection, are not paid for personal services:

(i) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the employee in a position or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of reinstatement in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or wages which the individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be considered earnable compensation, to the extent provided above, and the individual shall receive the equivalent service credit.

(ii) In any year in which a member serves in the legislature the member shall have the option of having such member's earnable compensation be the greater of:

(A) The earnable compensation the member would have received had such member not served in the legislature; or

(B) Such member's actual earnable compensation received for teaching and legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement system required because compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection is greater than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection shall be paid by the member for both member and employer contributions.

(c) In calculating earnable compensation under (a) or (b) of this subsection, the department of retirement systems shall include:

(i) Any compensation forgone by a member employed by a state agency or institution during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory or voluntary leave without pay, temporary reduction in pay implemented prior to December 11, 2010, or temporary layoffs if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer;

(ii) Any compensation forgone by a member during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, or reductions to current pay if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer. Reductions to current pay shall not include elimination of previously agreed upon future salary reductions; and

(iii) Any compensation forgone by a member during the 2019-2021 and 2021-2023 fiscal biennia as a result of reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, furloughs, reductions to current pay, or other similar measures resulting from the COVID-19 budgetary crisis, if the reduced compensation is an integral part of the employer's expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer. Reductions to current pay shall not include elimination of previously agreed upon future salary increases.

(15)(a) "Eligible position" for plan 2 members from June 7, 1990, through September 1, 1991, means a position which normally requires two or more uninterrupted months of creditable service during September through August of the following year.

(b) "Eligible position" for plan 2 and plan 3 on and after September 1, 1991, means a position that, as defined by the employer, normally requires five or more months of at least seventy hours of earnable compensation during September through August of the following year.

(c) For purposes of this chapter an employer shall not define "position" in such a manner that an employee's monthly work for that employer is divided into more than one position.

(d) The elected position of the superintendent of public instruction is an eligible position.

(16) "Employed" or "employee" means a person who is providing services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free from the employer's direction and control over the performance of work. The department shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection consistent with common law.

(17) "Employer" means the state of Washington, the school district, or any agency of the state of Washington by which the member is paid. Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, "employer" does not include a government contractor. For purposes of this subsection, a "government contractor" is any entity, including a partnership, limited liability company, for-profit or nonprofit corporation, or person, that provides services pursuant to a contract with an employer. The determination whether an employer-employee relationship has been established is not based on the relationship between a government contractor and an employer, but is based solely on the relationship between a government contractor's employee and an employer under this chapter. For the purposes of retirement plan membership, this subsection includes tribal schools who have chosen to participate in the retirement system and satisfied the requirements of RCW 28A.715.010(7).

(18) "Fiscal year" means a year which begins July 1st and ends June 30th of the following year.

(19) "Former state fund" means the state retirement fund in operation for teachers under chapter 187, Laws of 1923, as amended.

(20) "Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor.

(21) "Index A" means the index for the year prior to the determination of a postretirement adjustment.

(22) "Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.

(23) "Index year" means the earliest calendar year in which the index is more than sixty percent of index A.

(24) "Local fund" means any of the local retirement funds for teachers operated in any school district in accordance with the provisions of chapter 163, Laws of 1917 as amended.

(25) "Member" means any teacher included in the membership of the retirement system who has not been removed from membership under RCW 41.32.878 or 41.32.768. Also, any other employee of the public schools who, on July 1, 1947, had not elected to be exempt from membership and who, prior to that date, had by an authorized payroll deduction, contributed to the member reserve.

(26) "Member account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan 3 means the sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member in the defined contribution portion of plan 3.

(27) "Member reserve" means the fund in which all of the accumulated contributions of members are held.

(28) "Membership service" means service rendered subsequent to the first day of eligibility of a person to membership in the retirement system: PROVIDED, That where a member is employed by two or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service is rendered. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(29) "Pension" means the moneys payable per year during life from the pension reserve.

(30) "Pension reserve" is a fund in which shall be accumulated an actuarial reserve adequate to meet present and future pension liabilities of the system and from which all pension obligations are to be paid.

(31) "Plan 1" means the teachers' retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system prior to October 1, 1977.

(32) "Plan 2" means the teachers' retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of the system on and after October 1, 1977, and prior to July 1, 1996.

(33) "Plan 3" means the teachers' retirement system, plan 3 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first become members of the system on and after July 1, 1996, or who transfer under RCW 41.32.817.

(34) "Prior service" means service rendered prior to the first date of eligibility to membership in the retirement system for which credit is allowable. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(35) "Prior service contributions" means contributions made by a member to secure credit for prior service. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(36) "Public school" means any institution or activity operated by the state of Washington or any instrumentality or political subdivision thereof employing teachers, except the University of Washington and Washington State University. For the purposes of retirement plan membership, this subsection includes tribal schools who have chosen to participate in the retirement system and satisfied the requirements of RCW 28A.715.010(7).

(37) "Regular contributions" means the amounts required to be deducted from the compensation of a member and credited to the member's individual account in the member reserve. This subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(38) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(39) "Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer while a member.

(40)(a) "Retirement allowance" for plan 1 members, means monthly payments based on the sum of annuity and pension, or any optional benefits payable in lieu thereof.

(b) "Retirement allowance" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means monthly payments to a retiree or beneficiary as provided in this chapter.

(41) "Retirement system" means the Washington state teachers' retirement system.

(42) "Separation from service or employment" occurs when a person has terminated all employment with an employer. Separation from service or employment does not occur, and if claimed by an employer or employee may be a violation of RCW 41.32.055, when an employee and employer have a written or oral agreement to resume employment with the same employer following termination. Mere expressions or inquiries about postretirement employment by an employer or employee that do not constitute a commitment to reemploy the employee after retirement are not an agreement under this section.

(43)(a) "Service" for plan 1 members means the time during which a member has been employed by an employer for compensation.

(i) If a member is employed by two or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service is rendered.

(ii) As authorized by RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of sick leave may be creditable as service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470.

(iii) As authorized in RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement system that covers teachers in public schools may be applied solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470.

(iv) Reduction efforts such as furloughs, reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, or other similar situations as contemplated by subsection (14)(c)(iii) of this section do not result in a reduction in service credit that otherwise would have been earned for that month of work, and the member shall receive the full service credit for the hours that were scheduled to be worked before the reduction.

(b) "Service" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means periods of employment by a member for one or more employers for which earnable compensation is earned subject to the following conditions:

(i) A member employed in an eligible position or as a substitute shall receive one service credit month for each month of September through August of the following year if he or she earns earnable compensation for eight hundred ten or more hours during that period and is employed during nine of those months, except that a member may not receive credit for any period prior to the member's employment in an eligible position except as provided in RCW 41.32.812 and 41.50.132.

(ii) Any other member employed in an eligible position or as a substitute who earns earnable compensation during the period from September through August shall receive service credit according to one of the following methods, whichever provides the most service credit to the member:

(A) If a member is employed either in an eligible position or as a substitute teacher for nine months of the twelve-month period between September through August of the following year but earns earnable compensation for less than eight hundred ten hours but for at least six hundred thirty hours, he or she will receive one-half of a service credit month for each month of the twelve-month period;

(B) If a member is employed in an eligible position or as a substitute teacher for at least five months of a six-month period between September through August of the following year and earns earnable compensation for six hundred thirty or more hours within the six-month period, he or she will receive a maximum of six service credit months for the school year, which shall be recorded as one service credit month for each month of the six-month period;

(C) All other members employed in an eligible position or as a substitute teacher shall receive service credit as follows:

(I) A service credit month is earned in those calendar months where earnable compensation is earned for ninety or more hours;

(II) A half-service credit month is earned in those calendar months where earnable compensation is earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours; and

(III) A quarter-service credit month is earned in those calendar months where earnable compensation is earned for less than seventy hours.

(iii) Any person who is a member of the teachers' retirement system and who is elected or appointed to a state elective position may continue to be a member of the retirement system and continue to receive a service credit month for each of the months in a state elective position by making the required member contributions.

(iv) When an individual is employed by two or more employers the individual shall only receive one month's service credit during any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours is rendered.

(v) As authorized by RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of sick leave may be creditable as service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470. For purposes of plan 2 and plan 3 "forty-five days" as used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months. Use of less than forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under this subsection as follows:

(A) Less than eleven days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(B) Eleven or more days but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service credit month;

(C) Twenty-two days equals one service credit month;

(D) More than twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days equals one and one-quarter service credit month;

(E) Thirty-three or more days but less than forty-five days equals one and one-half service credit month.

(vi) As authorized in RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement system that covers teachers in public schools may be applied solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470.

(vii) Reduction efforts such as furloughs, reduced work hours, mandatory leave without pay, temporary layoffs, or other similar situations as contemplated by subsection (14)(c)(iii) of this section do not result in a reduction in service credit that otherwise would have been earned for that month of work, and the member shall receive the full service credit for the hours that were scheduled to be worked before the reduction.

(viii) The department shall adopt rules implementing this subsection.

(44) "Service credit month" means a full service credit month or an accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.

(45) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.

(46) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).

(47) "State elective position" means any position held by any person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed as a member of the legislature.

(48) "Substitute teacher" means:

(a) A teacher who is hired by an employer to work as a temporary teacher, except for teachers who are annual contract employees of an employer and are guaranteed a minimum number of hours; or

(b) Teachers who either (i) work in ineligible positions for more than one employer or (ii) work in an ineligible position or positions together with an eligible position.

(49) "Teacher" means any person qualified to teach who is engaged by a public school in an instructional, administrative, or supervisory capacity. The term includes state, educational service district, and school district superintendents and their assistants and all employees certificated by the superintendent of public instruction; and in addition thereto any full time school doctor who is employed by a public school and renders service of an instructional or educational nature.

[ 2021 c 12 s 3; 2018 c 257 s 2; 2012 c 236 s 3; 2011 1st sp.s. c 5 s 2. Prior: 2010 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 904; 2010 1st sp.s. c 32 s 7; prior: 2008 c 204 s 1; 2008 c 175 s 1; prior: 2007 c 398 s 3; 2007 c 50 s 1; prior: 2005 c 131 s 8; 2005 c 23 s 1; 2003 c 31 s 1; 1997 c 254 s 3; 1996 c 39 s 1; prior: 1995 c 345 s 9; 1995 c 239 s 102; prior: 1994 c 298 s 3; 1994 c 247 s 2; 1994 c 197 s 12; 1993 c 95 s 7; prior: 1992 c 212 s 1; 1992 c 3 s 3; prior: 1991 c 343 s 3; 1991 c 35 s 31; 1990 c 274 s 2; 1987 c 265 s 1; 1985 c 13 s 6; prior: 1984 c 256 s 1; 1984 c 5 s 1; 1983 c 5 s 1; 1982 1st ex.s. c 52 s 6; 1981 c 256 s 5; 1979 ex.s. c 249 s 5; 1977 ex.s. c 293 s 18; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 149; 1974 ex.s. c 199 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 95; 1967 c 50 s 11; 1965 ex.s. c 81 s 1; 1963 ex.s. c 14 s 1; 1955 c 274 s 1; 1947 c 80 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-20; prior: 1941 c 97 s 1; 1939 c 86 s 1; 1937 c 221 s 1; 1931 c 115 s 1; 1923 c 187 s 1; 1917 c 163 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4995-1.]

NOTES:

Retroactive application—2021 c 12: See note following RCW 41.26.030.

Contingency—Conflict with federal law—2018 c 257: See note following RCW 28A.715.010.

Purpose—Application—2012 c 236: See note following RCW 41.26.030.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 5: See note following RCW 41.26.030.

Effective date—2010 2nd sp.s. c 1: See note following RCW 38.52.105.

Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 32: See notes following RCW 42.04.060.

Findings—2007 c 398: See note following RCW 28A.405.415.

Effective date—2005 c 131: See note following RCW 41.40.823.

Intent—Construction—Application—1997 c 254: See notes following RCW 41.26.490.

Effective dates—1996 c 39: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1996, with the exception of section 23 of this act, which shall take effect immediately [March 13, 1996]." [ 1996 c 39 s 25.]

Intent—Effective date—1995 c 345: See notes following RCW 41.32.489.

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.

Intent—1994 c 298: See note following RCW 41.40.010.

Effective date—1994 c 247: See note following RCW 41.32.4991.

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 197: See notes following RCW 41.50.165.

Retroactive application—Effective date—1993 c 95: See notes following RCW 41.40.175.

Findings—Effective dates—1991 c 343: See notes following RCW 41.50.005.

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Findings—1990 c 274: "(1) The current system for calculating service credit for school district employees is difficult and costly to administer. By changing from the current hours per month calculation to an hours per year calculation, the accumulation of service credit by school district employees will be easier to understand and to administer.

(2) The current system for granting service credit for substitute teachers is difficult and costly to administer. By notifying substitute teachers of their eligibility for service credit and allowing the substitute teacher to apply for service credit, the accumulation of service credit by substitute teachers will be easier to understand and to administer.

(3) Currently, temporary employees in eligible positions in the public employees' retirement system are exempted from membership in the system for up to six months. If the position lasts for longer than six months the employee is made a member retroactively. This conditional exemption causes tracking problems for the department of retirement systems and places a heavy financial burden for back contributions on a temporary employee who crosses the six-month barrier. Under the provisions of this act all persons, other than retirees, who are hired in an eligible position will become members immediately, thereby alleviating the problems described in this section.

(4) The legislature finds that retirees from the plan 2 systems of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, and the public employees' retirement system, may not work for a nonfederal public employer without suffering a suspension of their retirement benefits. This fails to recognize the current and projected demographics indicating the decreasing workforce and that the expertise possessed by retired workers can provide a substantial benefit to the state. At the same time, the legislature recognizes that a person who is working full time should have his or her pension delayed until he or she enters full or partial retirement. By allowing plan 2 retirees to work in ineligible positions, the competing concerns listed above are both properly addressed." [ 1990 c 274 s 1.]

Intent—Reservation—1990 c 274 ss 2, 4: "(1) The 1990 amendments to RCW 41.32.010(27)(b) and 41.40.450 are intended by the legislature to effect administrative, rather than substantive, changes to the affected retirement plan. The legislature therefore reserves the right to revoke or amend the 1990 amendments to RCW 41.32.010(27)(b) and 41.40.450. No member is entitled to have his or her service credit calculated under the 1990 amendments to RCW 41.32.010(27)(b) and 41.40.450 as a matter of contractual right.

(2) The department's retroactive application of the changes made in RCW 41.32.010(27)(b) to all service rendered between October 1, 1977, and August 31, 1990, is consistent with the legislative intent of the 1990 changes to RCW 41.32.010(27)(b)." [ 1994 c 177 s 10; 1990 c 274 s 18.]

Effective date—1990 c 274: "Sections 1 through 8 of this act shall take effect September 1, 1990." [ 1990 c 274 s 21.]

Construction—1990 c 274: "This act shall not be construed as affecting any existing right acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the sections amended or repealed in this act or under any rule or order adopted under those sections, nor as affecting any proceeding instituted under those sections." [ 1990 c 274 s 17.]

Purpose—Application—Retrospective application—1985 c 13:See notes following RCW 41.04.445.

Effective dates—1982 1st ex.s. c 52: See note following RCW 2.10.180.

Purpose—Severability—1981 c 256: See notes following RCW 41.26.030.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 293: See notes following RCW 41.32.755.

Emergency—1974 ex.s. c 199: "This 1974 amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately." [ 1974 ex.s. c 199 s 7.]

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 199: "If any provision of this 1974 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1974 ex.s. c 199 s 8.]

Construction—1974 ex.s. c 199: "(1) Subsection (3) of section 4 of this 1974 amendatory act relating to elected and appointed officials shall be retroactive to January 1, 1973.

(2) Amendatory language contained in subsection (11) of section 1 relating to members as members of the legislature and in provisos (2) and (3) of section 2 of this 1974 amendatory act shall only apply to those members who are serving as a state senator, state representative or state superintendent of public instruction on or after the effective date of this 1974 amendatory act.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this 1974 amendatory act, RCW 41.32.497 as last amended by section 2, chapter 189, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. shall be applicable to any member serving as a state senator, state representative or superintendent of public instruction on the effective date of this 1974 amendatory act." [ 1974 ex.s. c 199 s 5.]

Reviser's note: (1) "Subsection (3) of section 4 of this 1974 amendatory act" is codified as RCW 41.32.498(3).

(2) Sections 1 and 2 of 1974 ex.s. c 199 consist of amendments to RCW 41.32.010 and 41.32.260. For amendatory language, a portion of which was vetoed, see the 1973-1974 session laws.

(3) "this 1974 amendatory act" [1974 ex.s. c 199] is codified in RCW 41.32.010, 41.32.260, 41.32.497, 41.32.498, and 41.32.4945. The effective date of 1974 ex.s. c 199 is May 6,1974.

Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 176: The effective date of the amendments to this section and RCW 41.32.420 is April 25, 1969.

Effective date—1967 c 50: "This 1967 amendatory act shall take effect on July 1, 1967." [ 1967 c 50 s 12.]

Severability—1967 c 50: "If any provision of this 1967 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of this 1967 amendatory act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1967 c 50 s 13.]

Severability—1965 ex.s. c 81: "If any provision of this act is held to be invalid the remainder of this act shall not be affected." [ 1965 ex.s. c 81 s 9.]

Effective date—1965 ex.s. c 81: "The effective date of this act is July 1, 1965." [ 1965 ex.s. c 81 s 10.]

Savings—1963 ex.s. c 14: "The amendment of any section by this 1963 act shall not be construed as impairing any existing right acquired or any liability incurred by any member under the provisions of the section amended; nor shall it affect any vested right of any former member who reenters public school employment or becomes reinstated as a member subsequent to the effective date of such act." [ 1963 ex.s. c 14 s 23.]

Severability—1963 ex.s. c 14: "If any provision of this act is held to be invalid the remainder of the act shall not be affected." [ 1963 ex.s. c 14 s 24.]

Effective date—1963 ex.s. c 14: "The effective date of this act is July 1, 1964." [ 1963 ex.s. c 14 s 26.]